Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2368
Sale of recyclable and reusable products, materials, and supplies; proceeds; disposition.

Revenue from the sale by the state of recyclable and reusable products, materials, and supplies shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Resource Recovery Fund.

Laws 1990, LB 163, § 8.